Hawaii statutes.
[§103F-104] Exemption from chapter
103D. Contracts to purchase health and human services required to be
awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements of
chapter 103D, unless a provision of this chapter imposes a requirement of chapter
103D on the contract or purchase. [L 1997, c 190, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next